Utah statutes.
58-37e-14.   Representation of governmental entities -- Stay of action.
(1)  A county attorney, district attorney, or city attorney may represent any
political subdivision of the state, and the attorney general may represent the
state in an action brought under this chapter.
(2)  On motion by a governmental agency involved in a drug investigation or
prosecution, an action brought under this chapter shall be stayed until the
completion of the criminal investigation or prosecution that gave rise to the
motion for a stay of the action.
